Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
196D

GEOTHERMAL
AND CABLE SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT]

Section

196D-1 Short title

196D-2 Findings and declaration of purpose

196D-3 Definitions

196D-4 Consolidated permit application and
review process

196D-5 Consolidated permit application and
review procedure

196D-6 Interagency group

196D-7 Streamlining activities

196D-8 Information services

196D-9 Construction of the chapter; rules

196D-10 Transfer of functions

196D-11 Annual report

196D-12 Severability

196D-13 Exemptions from certain state laws

196D-14 Development of geothermal resources on
Maui

Note

Consultation and input from Native Hawaiian community and
general public when developing geothermal energy resources with public land
trust lands. L 2012, c 193, §2.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Case Notes

Government enjoined from further participation in geothermal
energy project until completion of environmental impact statement. 767 F.
Supp. 1518; see also 754 F. Supp. 1450.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next